Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1905.   Authority to resolve controversy between state and contractor.

A protest officer, or the protest officer's designee, is authorized, before commencement of an action in court concerning a controversy that arises between a procurement unit and a contractor in relation to an existing contract between the procurement unit and the contractor, including controversies based upon breach of contract, mistake, misrepresentation, or other cause for contract modification or rescission, to settle and resolve the controversy.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

